Utah statutes.
49-11-605.   Notification and correction of violations.

If a participating employer discovers that it has violated Section 49-11-601, 49-11-602, or 49-11-603 prior to the office becoming aware of the violation, notifies the office of the violation in writing, and corrects the violation within a period agreed to by the office, the penalties under those sections shall be waived.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

